dev/spellrelax.twol
Alphabet
    a b c d ɛ e ə f g h i j k l m n ŋ o ɔ s t u v w x y z ɑ ʉ ʼ ! α ε
    A B C D Ɛ E Ə F G H I J K L M N Ŋ O Ɔ S T U V W X Y Z Ɑ Ʉ ʼ ! Α Ε



%ʻ:%ʻ %ʼ:%ʻ
%’:%’ %ʼ:%’
%‘:%‘ %ʼ:%‘
%ʼ:%ʼ %ʼ:%ʼ
%':%' %ʼ:%'

̀
̀:0
́
́:0
̂
̂:0
̌
̌:0

ə:ə
ә:ә   ә:ə
ə:e

ɛ:ɛ
ε:ε   ɛ:ε
ɛ:è

ɑ:ɑ
α:α   ɑ:α
ɑ:à
ɑ:α

ɔ:ɔ
ɔ:ɔ   ɔ:ɔ
ɔ:ò
ɔ:ô

ʉ:ʉ
ʉ:ʉ   ʉ:ʉ
ʉ:ù

e:e
e:i

i:i
i:é

ŋ:ŋ
ŋ:ṅ

;

Rules

"Unify apostrophe styles"
a => _ ;

"t in tsh"
t:0 <=> _ s:c h: ;

"s in tsh"
s:c <=> t: _ h: ;

"h in tsh"
h:0 <=> t: s:c _ ;
